Wisconsin, session 2025, SB697.
do enact as follows:SB697,14Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 5insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB697,28Section 2. 20.515 (1) (x) of the statutes is created to read:SB697,2,14920.515 (1) (x) Actuarial studies by group insurance board; school district 10participation in group health insurance. From moneys credited to the public 11employee trust fund administrative account under s. 40.04 (2), biennially, the 12amounts in the schedule for conducting the studies of voluntary and mandatory 13participation by school districts in a group health insurance plan offered by the 14group insurance board under 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act), section 3 (1) (a).SB697,315Section 3. Nonstatutory provisions.SB697,2,1716(1) Actuarial studies by group insurance board; school district 17participation in group health insurance.SB697,2,2218(a) The group insurance board, in consultation with the actuary selected 19under s. 40.03 (1) (d) to perform actuarial services for group health insurance plans 20offered by the group insurance board, shall conduct a study of the potential costs 21and savings to school districts and current plan participants for each of the 22following:SB697,2,24231. If all Wisconsin school districts are required to participate in a group health 24insurance plan offered by the group insurance board.SB697,3,212. If Wisconsin school districts voluntarily participate in a group health 2insurance plan offered by the group insurance board.SB697,3,53(b) By no later than 6 months after the effective date of this paragraph, the 4group insurance board shall submit a written report of the studies under par. (a) to 5the governor and the joint committee on finance.SB697,3,66